New Jersey, session 222, S4530.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, the Superior court, Chancery Division, Family Part, shall, upon application by a parent or guardian of a minor child, order additional periods of parenting time to compensate a parent or guardian for the denial of court-ordered parenting time under the circumstances set forth in subsection b. of this section. b. Unless a party can demonstrate good cause why such an order should not be entered, the court shall, subject to the best interests of the child, order additional periods of parenting time to compensate for any denial of court-ordered parenting time that resulted from an investigation by any investigative agency, including but not limited to, the Division of Child Protection and Permanency, or from the provision of a restraining order, or protective order, or any investigative agency, which did not result in a finding of abuse or neglect. c.  The additional periods of parenting time: (1) shall be of the same type and duration as the parenting time that was denied; (2) may include weekday, weekend, holiday, and summer parenting time; and (3) must occur on or before the second anniversary of the date the court determines that court-ordered parenting time was denied. d.  Subject to the best interests of the child, the parent who was denied parenting time shall be entitled to select the time and dates for the additional parenting time, consistent with subsection b. e.  The provision of P.L. c.   C.    (C.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be construed to impose liability in any civil action against an investigative agency or governmental entity or employee thereof. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.